Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.12.080

Reports of apparent crime.

A trust company that is the victim of a robbery, has a shortage of corporate or fiduciary funds in excess of five thousand dollars, or is the victim of an apparent or suspected misapplication of its corporate or fiduciary funds or property in any amount by a director, manager, managing participant, officer, or employee shall report such robbery, shortages, or apparent or suspected misapplication to the director within forty-eight hours after the time it is discovered. The initial report may be oral if the report is promptly confirmed in writing. The trust company or a director, manager, managing participant, officer, employee, or agent is not subject to liability for defamation or another charge resulting from information supplied in the report.

[ 2014 c 37 s 354.]